Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.120

Record of proceedings—Verified copy as evidence.

The inspector shall make and sign a record of the proceedings, stating the name of the owner or reputed owner of the property, if known; location of the property, date of inspection and the results thereof; date and manner of giving notice to disinfect; failure to disinfect; disinfection by the inspector; the cost thereof in detail; date and manner of giving notice of impounding and sale; date, place, and manner of sale; name of the purchaser; and amount of the proceeds and disposition thereof.

Upon demand of the owner or person in charge of the property, the inspector shall furnish him or her with a verified copy of the record, and tender him or her the balance of the proceeds. If no demand is made within thirty days of the sale, or if the tender is refused, the inspector shall file a verified copy of the record with and remit any balance of the proceeds to the director, and if it is not claimed by the owner within six months, it shall be deposited in the state treasury.

The record or a verified copy thereof shall be admissible in evidence as prima facie evidence of the truth of its contents.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6010; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.120. Prior: 1915 c 166 s 12, part; RRS s 2850, part.]